Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1007
Rule 1007. Contents of writings, recordings, or photographs; how proved.

Contents of writings, recordings, or photographs may be proved by the testimony or deposition of the party against whom offered or by his written admission, without accounting for the nonproduction of the original.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 70.